Washington statutes.
RCW 19.77.015

Reservation—Fees—Rules.

The exclusive right to the use of a trademark may be reserved by:

(1) A person intending to register a trademark under this title; or

(2) A domestic or foreign corporation intending to change its trademark.

The reservation shall be made by filing with the secretary of state an application to reserve a specified trademark or service mark, executed by or on behalf of the applicant, one copy of the trademark artwork, and fees as set by rule by the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the trademark is available for use, the secretary of state shall reserve the trademark for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of one hundred eighty days. The reservation is limited to one filing.

[ 1994 c 60 s 2.]